ro-RO: Echipament inclus pentru rounders: Mingi; Baze; Bâte; Suport pentru lovit; Geantă de transport; Conuri; Plasă; Aparat de lansat mingi; Stâlpi; Panou de ricoșeu; Altele
pt-PT: Equipamento de rounders incluído: Bolas; Bases; Tacos; Tee de rebatida; Saco de transporte; Cones; Rede; Máquina de lançar; Postes; Tabela de ressalto; Outro
lt-LT: Pridedama „Rounders“ įranga: Kamuoliukai; Bazės; Lazdos; Atmušimo stovas; Nešiojimo krepšys; Kūgeliai; Tinklas; Kamuoliukų metimo mašina; Stulpeliai; Atmušimo lenta; Kita
hu: Rounders felszerelés a csomagban: Labdák; Bázisok; Ütők; Ütőállvány; Hordtáska; Bóják; Háló; Dobógép; Oszlopok; Visszapattanó palánk; Egyéb
fi: Mukana tulevat rounders-varusteet: Pallot; Pesät; Mailat; Lyöntiteline; Kantokassi; Kartiot; Verkko; Syöttökone; Tolpat; Kimmokelauta; Muu
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός rounders: Μπάλες; Βάσεις; Ρόπαλα; Βάση χτυπήματος (batting tee); Τσάντα μεταφοράς; Κώνοι; Δίχτυ; Μηχανή ρίψης; Στύλοι; Πίνακας αναπήδησης; Άλλο
es: Equipo de rounders incluido: Pelotas; Bases; Bates; Soporte de bateo; Bolsa de transporte; Conos; Red; Máquina de lanzamiento; Postes; Tabla de rebote; Otro
bg-BG: Включено оборудване за раундърс: Топки; Бази; Бухалки; Стойка за батиране; Чанта за пренасяне; Конуси; Мрежа; Машина за хвърляне; Колове; Дъска за отскачане; Друго
ja: ラウンダー装置を含む: ボール; ベース; バット; バッティングティー; キャリーバッグ; コーン; ネット; ピッチングマシン; ポスト; リバウンドボード; その他
pl: Dołączone wyposażenie do rounders: Piłki; Bazy; Kije; Stojak do odbijania; Torba do przenoszenia; Pachołki; Siatka; Wyrzutnia piłek; Słupki; Tablica odbijająca; Inne
nl: Inbegrepen roundersuitrusting: Ballen; Honken; Knuppels; Batting tee; Draagtas; Pionnen; Net; Pitching-machine; Palen; Rebound-bord; Overige
sk-SK: Vybavenie k hre s loptou do kruhu: Loptičky; Mety; Pálky; Odpaľovací stojan; Prenosná taška; Kužele; Sieť; Nadhadzovací stroj; Stĺpiky; Odrazová doska; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับเล่นราวน์เดอร์สที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ลูกบอล; เบส; ไม้ตี; แท่นวางลูกตี; กระเป๋าพกพา; กรวย; ตาข่าย; เครื่องขว้างลูก; เสา; กระดานสะท้อนกลับ; อื่นๆ
de: Schlagballausrüstung inklusive: Bälle; Bases; Schläger; Batting-Tee; Tragetasche; Hütchen; Netz; Ballwurfmaschine; Pfosten; Rebound-Wand; Sonstige
cs: Výbava pro klepanou v balení: Míčky; Mety; Pálky; Odpalovací stativ; Přenosná taška; Kužely; Síť; Nadhazovací stroj; Sloupky; Odrazová deska; Jiné
hr-HR: Uključena oprema za rounders: Loptice; Baze; Palice; Stalak za udaranje; Torba za nošenje; Čunjevi; Mreža; Stroj za bacanje; Stupovi; Odbijač; Ostalo
ru: Состав оборудования для раундерса: Мячи; Базы; Биты; Стойка для отбивания; Сумка для переноски; Конусы; Сетка; Машина для подачи мячей; Стойки; Отбойная доска; Другое
sl-SI: Vključene komponente kompleta rulete: Žogice; Baze; Kiji; Nastavek za udarjanje; Torba za prenašanje; Stožci; Mreža; Strojček za metanje; Količki; Odbojna plošča; Drugo
zh-TW: 包含繞圈球裝備: 球; 壘包; 球棒; 打擊座; 提袋; 標誌筒; 網; 發球機; 柱子; 籃板; 其他
pt-BR: Rounders, equipamentos incluídos: Bolas; Bases; Tacos; Suporte de rebatida (tee); Bolsa de transporte; Cones; Rede; Máquina de arremesso; Postes; Tabela de rebote; Outro
zh-CN: 包含圆场棒球装备: 球; 垒包; 球棒; 击球座; 便携袋; 锥形筒; 球网; 发球机; 标杆; 反弹板; 其他
ko: 라운더스 장비 포함: 공; 베이스; 배트; 배팅 티; 휴대용 가방; 콘; 네트; 피칭 머신; 포스트; 리바운드 보드; 기타
sv: Medföljande utrustning för rounders: Bollar; Baser; Slagträn; Slagtee; Bärväska; Koner; Nät; Kastmaskin; Stolpar; Studsbräda; Övrigt
da: Medfølgende rundboldudstyr: Bolde; Baser; Bat; Batting tee; Bæretaske; Kegler; Net; Kastemaskine; Stolper; Rebound-bræt; Andet
fr: Équipement de rounders inclus: Balles; Bases; Battes; Support de frappe; Sac de transport; Cônes; Filet; Lance-balles; Poteaux; Planche de rebond; Autre
tr: Dahil olan rounders ekipmanları: Toplar; Kaleler; Sopalar; Vuruş standı; Taşıma çantası; Koniler; Ağ; Atış makinesi; Direkler; Ribaund panosu; Diğer
it: Attrezzatura da rounders inclusa: Palle; Basi; Mazze; Batting tee; Borsa per il trasporto; Coni; Rete; Macchina lanciapalle; Paletti; Tavola di rimbalzo; Altro
nb: Inkludert rounders-utstyr: Baller; Baser; Balltrær; Slagstativ; Bærebag; Kjegler; Nett; Kastemaskin; Stolper; Returbrett; Annet
vi: Dụng cụ đi kèm của môn bóng Rounders: Bóng; Chốt gôn; Gậy; Giá đánh bóng; Túi đựng; Cọc tiêu nón; Lưới; Máy ném bóng; Cọc; Bảng bật nảy; Khác
en: Rounders equipment included: Balls; Bases; Bats; Batting tee; Carry bag; Cones; Net; Pitching machine; Posts; Rebound board; Other